Indiana, session 2026, SB236.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-18-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.136-2013,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. "Abortion" means the termination of human
pregnancy with an intention other than to produce a live birth or to
remove a dead fetus. The term includes abortions by surgical
procedures and by abortion inducing drugs. act of using or
prescribing an instrument, a drug, a medicine, or any other
substance, device, or means with the intent to cause the death of an
unborn child of a woman. The term does not include birth control
devices or contraceptives. An act is not an abortion if the act is
done with the intent to:
(1) save the life or preserve the health of an unborn child;
(2) remove a dead, unborn child whose death was caused by
miscarriage or stillbirth; or
(3) remove an ectopic pregnancy.
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


SECTION 2. IC 16-18-2-1.6, AS ADDED BY P.L.136-2013,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.6. "Abortion inducing drug" means a medicine,
drug, or substance prescribed or dispensed with the intent of
terminating a clinically diagnosable pregnancy with the knowledge that
the termination will, with reasonable likelihood, cause the death of the
fetus. The term includes the off-label use of a drug known to have
abortion inducing properties if the drug is prescribed with the intent of
causing an abortion. a drug, a medicine, or any other substance,
including a regimen of two (2) or more drugs, medicines, or
substances, prescribed, dispensed, or administered with the intent
of terminating a clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman and
with knowledge that the termination will, with reasonable
likelihood, cause the death of the woman's unborn child. The term
includes off label use of drugs, medicines, or other substances
known to have abortion inducing properties that are prescribed,
dispensed, or administered with the intent of causing an abortion,
including:
(1) the mifepristone (Mifeprex) regimen;
(2) misoprostol (Cytotec); and
(3) methotrexate.
The term does not include a drug, medicine, or other substance
that may be known to cause an abortion but is prescribed,
dispensed, or administered for other medical reasons.
SECTION 3. IC 16-18-2-167, AS AMENDED BY P.L.117-2015,
SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 167. (a) "Health facility":
(1) except for purposes of IC 16-28-15, means a building, a
structure, an institution, or other place for the reception,
accommodation, board, care, or treatment extending beyond a
continuous twenty-four (24) hour period in a week of more than
four (4) individuals who need or desire such services because of
physical or mental illness, infirmity, or impairment; and
(2) for purposes of IC 16-28-15, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-28-15-3; and
(3) for purposes of IC 16-34-7, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-34-7-3(3).
(b) The term does not include the premises used for the reception,
accommodation, board, care, or treatment in a household or family, for
compensation, of a person related by blood to the head of the
household or family (or to the spouse of the head of the household or
family) within the degree of consanguinity of first cousins.
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


(c) The term does not include any of the following:
(1) Hotels, motels, or mobile homes when used as such.
(2) Hospitals or mental hospitals, except for that part of a hospital
that provides long term care services and functions as a health
facility, in which case that part of the hospital is licensed under
IC 16-21-2, but in all other respects is subject to IC 16-28.
(3) Hospices that furnish inpatient care and are licensed under
IC 16-25-3.
(4) Institutions operated by the federal government.
(5) Foster family homes or day care centers.
(6) Schools for individuals who are deaf or blind.
(7) Day schools for individuals with an intellectual disability.
(8) Day care centers.
(9) Children's homes and child placement agencies.
(10) Offices of practitioners of the healing arts.
(11) Any institution in which health care services and private duty
nursing services are provided that is listed and certified by the
Commission for Accreditation of Christian Science Nursing
Organizations/Facilities, Inc.
(12) Industrial clinics providing only emergency medical services
or first aid for employees.
(13) A residential facility (as defined in IC 12-7-2-165).
(14) Maternity homes.
(15) Offices of Christian Science practitioners.
SECTION 4. IC 16-18-2-282, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2022,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 282. (a) "Physician", except as provided in
subsections (b), (c), and (e), means a licensed physician (as defined in
section 202 of this chapter).
(b) "Physician", for purposes of IC 16-41-12, has the meaning set
forth in IC 16-41-12-7.
(c) "Physician", for purposes of IC 16-37-1-3.1 and IC 16-37-3-5,
means an individual who:
(1) was the physician last in attendance (as defined in section
282.2 of this chapter); or
(2) is licensed under IC 25-22.5.
(d) "Physician", for purposes of IC 16-48-1, is subject to
IC 16-48-1-2.
(e) "Physician", for purposes of IC 16-34-6, has the meaning set
forth in IC 16-34-6-3.
(f) "Physician", for purposes of IC 16-34-7, has the meaning set
forth in IC 16-34-7-3(4).
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


SECTION 5. IC 16-34-1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2021,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. No:
(1) physician;
(2) nurse;
(3) physician assistant;
(4) pharmacist;
(5) employee or member of the staff of a hospital or other facility
in which an abortion may be performed; or
(6) mental health provider;
shall be required to perform an abortion, to prescribe, administer, or
dispense an abortion inducing drug in violation of IC 16-34-7, to
provide advice or counsel to a pregnant woman concerning medical
procedures resulting in, or intended to result in, an abortion, to assist
or participate in medical procedures resulting in, or intended to result
in an abortion, or to handle or dispose of aborted remains, if that
individual objects to such procedures on ethical, moral, or religious
grounds.
SECTION 6. IC 16-34-2-1, AS AMENDED BY THE TECHNICAL
CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IS
AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]:
Sec. 1. (a) Abortion shall in all instances be a criminal act, except when
performed under the following circumstances:
(1) Except as prohibited in IC 16-34-4, before the earlier of
viability of the fetus or twenty (20) weeks of postfertilization age
of the fetus, if:
(A) for reasons based upon the professional, medical judgment
of the pregnant woman's physician, if either:
(i) the abortion is necessary when reasonable medical
judgment dictates that performing the abortion is necessary
to prevent any serious health risk to the pregnant woman or
to save the pregnant woman's life; or
(ii) the fetus is diagnosed with a lethal fetal anomaly;
(B) the abortion is performed by the physician in a hospital
licensed under IC 16-21 or an ambulatory outpatient surgical
center (as defined in IC 16-18-2-14) that has a majority
ownership by a hospital licensed under IC 16-21;
(C) the woman submitting to the abortion has filed her consent
with her physician. However, if in the judgment of the
physician the abortion is necessary to preserve the life of the
woman, her consent is not required;
(D) the woman submitting to the abortion has filed with her
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


physician the written consent of her parent or legal guardian
if required under section 4 of this chapter; and
(E) before the abortion, the attending physician shall certify in
writing to the hospital or ambulatory outpatient surgical center
in which the abortion is to be performed, that:
(i) in the attending physician's reasonable medical judgment,
performing the abortion is necessary to prevent any serious
health risk to the pregnant woman or to save the pregnant
woman's life; or
(ii) the fetus has been diagnosed with a lethal fetal anomaly.
All facts and reasons supporting the certification shall be set
forth by the physician in writing and attached to the certificate.
However, under this article, an abortion inducing drug may not be
dispensed, prescribed, administered, or otherwise given to a
pregnant woman after eight (8) weeks of postfertilization age
unless the abortion inducing drug is being administered as
part of an abortion authorized under this article or for the
removal of a dead fetus due to miscarriage. A physician must
dispense the abortion inducing drug in person and have the
pregnant woman consume the drug in the presence of the
physician. A physician shall examine a pregnant woman in person
before prescribing or dispensing an abortion inducing drug. The
physician shall provide the pregnant woman with a copy of the
manufacturer's instruction sheets and require that the pregnant
woman sign the manufacturer's patient agreement form. A
physician shall also provide, orally and in writing, along with
other discharge information, the following statement: "Some
evidence suggests that the effects of Mifepristone may be
avoided, ceased, or reversed if the second pill, Misoprostol, has
not been taken. Immediately contact the following for more
information at (insert applicable abortion inducing drug reversal
Internet web site website and corresponding hotline number).".
The physician shall retain a copy of the signed patient agreement
form, and the signed physician's agreement form required by the
manufacturer, in the patient's file. As used in this subdivision, "in
person" does not include the use of telehealth or telemedicine
services.
(2) Except as prohibited by IC 16-34-4, during the first ten (10)
weeks of postfertilization age of the fetus, if:
(A) the pregnancy is a result of rape or incest;
(B) all the circumstances and provisions required for legal
abortion set forth in subdivision (1)(C) through (1)(D) are
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


present and adhered to;
(C) the abortion is performed in a hospital licensed under
IC 16-21 or ambulatory outpatient surgical center (as defined
in IC 16-18-2-14) that has a majority ownership by a hospital
licensed under IC 16-21; and
(D) before the abortion, the attending physician shall certify in
writing to the ambulatory outpatient surgical center or hospital
in which the abortion is to be performed, after proper
examination, the abortion is being performed at the woman's
request because the pregnancy is the result of rape or incest.
All facts and reasons supporting the certification shall be set
forth by the physician in writing and attached to the certificate.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (b) or as prohibited by
IC 16-34-4, at the earlier of viability of the fetus or twenty (20)
weeks of postfertilization age and any time after, for reasons
based upon the professional, medical judgment of the pregnant
woman's physician if:
(A) based on reasonable medical judgment, performing the
abortion is necessary to prevent any serious health risk to the
pregnant woman or to save the pregnant woman's life;
(B) all the circumstances and provisions required for legal
abortion set forth in subdivision (1)(C) through (1)(D) are
present and adhered to;
(C) the abortion is performed in a hospital licensed under
IC 16-21;
(D) the abortion is performed in compliance with section 3 of
this chapter; and
(E) before the abortion, the attending physician shall certify in
writing to the hospital in which the abortion is to be
performed, that in the attending physician's reasonable medical
judgment, performing the abortion is necessary to prevent any
serious health risk to the pregnant woman or to save the
pregnant woman's life. All facts and reasons supporting the
certification shall be set forth by the physician in writing and
attached to the certificate.
(b) A person may not knowingly or intentionally perform a partial
birth abortion unless a physician reasonably believes that:
(1) performing the partial birth abortion is necessary to save the
mother's life; and
(2) no other medical procedure is sufficient to save the mother's
life.
(c) A person may not knowingly or intentionally perform a
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


dismemberment abortion unless reasonable medical judgment dictates
that performing the dismemberment abortion is necessary:
(1) to prevent any serious health risk to the mother; or
(2) to save the mother's life.
(d) Telehealth and telemedicine may not be used to provide any
abortion, including the writing or filling of a prescription for any
purpose that is intended to result in an abortion.
SECTION 7. IC 16-34-2-1.5, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) The state department shall develop an
informed consent brochure and post the informed consent brochure on
the state department's Internet web site. website.
(b) The state department shall develop an informed consent
brochure that includes the following:
(1) Objective scientific information concerning the probable
anatomical and physiological characteristics of a fetus every two
(2) weeks of gestational age, including the following:
(A) Realistic pictures in color for each age of the fetus,
including the dimensions of the fetus.
(B) Whether there is any possibility of the fetus surviving
outside the womb.
(2) Objective scientific information concerning the medical risks
associated with each abortion procedure, or the use of an abortion
inducing drug, including the following:
(A) The risks of infection and hemorrhaging.
(B) The potential danger:
(i) to a subsequent pregnancy; or
(ii) of infertility.
(3) Information concerning the medical risks associated with
carrying the child to term.
(4) Information that medical assistance benefits may be available
for prenatal care, childbirth, and neonatal care.
(5) Information that the biological father is liable for assistance in
support of the child, regardless of whether the biological father
has offered to pay for an abortion.
(6) Information regarding telephone 211 dialing code services for
accessing human services as described in IC 12-13-16, and the
types of services that are available through this service.
(7) Information concerning Indiana's safe haven law under
IC 31-34-2.5-1.
(8) Information that, under certain conditions, a pregnant woman
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


may relinquish a child who is, or who appears to be, not more
than thirty (30) days of age:
(A) to an emergency medical services provider (as defined in
IC 16-41-10-1); or
(B) in a newborn safety device described in IC 31-34-2.5-1.
(c) In the development of the informed consent brochure described
in this section, the state department shall use information and pictures
that are available at no cost or nominal cost to the state department.
(d) The informed consent brochure must include the requirements
specified in this chapter.
SECTION 8. IC 16-34-2-4.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.179-2022(ss),
SECTION 25, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) A physician may not perform an abortion
including an abortion using an abortion inducing drug, unless the
physician:
(1) has admitting privileges in writing at a hospital located in the
county where abortions are provided or in a contiguous county; or
(2) has entered into a written agreement with a physician who has
written admitting privileges at a hospital in the county or
contiguous county concerning the management of possible
complications of the services provided.
A written agreement described in subdivision (2) must be renewed
annually.
(b) A physician who performs an abortion including an abortion
using an abortion inducing drug, shall notify the patient of the location
of the hospital at which the physician or a physician with whom the
physician has entered into an agreement under subsection (a)(2) has
admitting privileges and where the patient may receive follow-up care
by the physician if complications arise.
(c) A hospital or ambulatory outpatient surgical center in which
abortions are performed shall:
(1) keep at the hospital or ambulatory outpatient surgical center
a copy of the admitting privileges of a physician described in
subsection (a)(1) and (a)(2) who is performing abortions at the
hospital or ambulatory outpatient surgical center; and
(2) submit a copy of the admitting privileges described in
subdivision (1) to the state department. The state department shall
verify the validity of the admitting privileges document. The state
department shall remove any identifying information from the
admitting privileges document before releasing the document
under IC 5-14-3.
(d) The state department shall annually submit a copy of the
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


admitting privileges described in subsection (a)(1) and a copy of the
written agreement described in subsection (a)(2) to:
(1) each hospital located in the county in which the hospital
granting the admitting privileges described in subsection (a) is
located; and
(2) each hospital located in a county that is contiguous to the
county described in subdivision (1);
where abortions are performed.
(e) The state department shall confirm to a member of the public,
upon request, that the admitting privileges required to be submitted
under this section for a hospital or ambulatory outpatient surgical
center have been received by the state department.
(f) Notwithstanding IC 5-14-3-6 and IC 5-14-3-6.5, this section only
allows for the redaction of information that is described in subsection
(c). This section does not allow the state department to limit the
disclosure of information in other public documents.
SECTION 9. IC 16-34-2-4.7, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.7. (a) As used in this section, "abortion
complication" means only the following physical or psychological
conditions arising from the induction or performance of an abortion:
(1) Uterine perforation.
(2) Cervical laceration.
(3) Infection.
(4) Vaginal bleeding that qualifies as a Grade 2 or higher adverse
event according to the Common Terminology Criteria for Adverse
Events (CTCAE).
(5) Pulmonary embolism.
(6) Deep vein thrombosis.
(7) Failure to terminate the pregnancy.
(8) Incomplete abortion (retained tissue).
(9) Pelvic inflammatory disease.
(10) Missed ectopic pregnancy.
(11) Cardiac arrest.
(12) Respiratory arrest.
(13) Renal failure.
(14) Shock.
(15) Amniotic fluid embolism.
(16) Coma.
(17) Placenta previa in subsequent pregnancies.
(18) Pre-term delivery in subsequent pregnancies.
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


(19) Free fluid in the abdomen.
(20) Hemolytic reaction due to the administration of
ABO-incompatible blood or blood products.
(21) Hypoglycemia occurring while the patient is being treated at
the hospital or ambulatory outpatient surgical center.
(22) Allergic reaction to anesthesia. or abortion inducing drugs.
(23) Psychological complications, including depression, suicidal
ideation, anxiety, and sleeping disorders.
(24) Death.
(25) Any other adverse event as defined by criteria provided in
the Food and Drug Administration Safety Information and
Adverse Event Reporting Program.
(b) The following persons shall report to the state department each
case in which the person treated a patient suffering from an abortion
complication:
(1) A physician licensed under IC 25-22.5.
(2) A hospital licensed under IC 16-21.
(3) Beginning September 1, 2022, an ambulatory outpatient
surgical center licensed under IC 16-21-2.
(c) The state department shall develop a process for the submission
of a report under this section.
(d) A report under this section shall be submitted to the state
department in the manner prescribed by the state department.
(e) The report under this section must include the following
information concerning the abortion complication:
(1) The date the patient presented for treatment for the abortion
complication.
(2) The age of the patient.
(3) The race of the patient.
(4) The county and state of the patient's residence.
(5) The type of abortion obtained by the patient.
(6) The date of abortion obtained by the patient.
(7) The name of the:
(A) hospital; or
(B) ambulatory outpatient surgical center;
where the patient obtained the abortion.
(8) Whether the abortion was performed or occurred in
Indiana or outside Indiana.
(8) (9) Whether the patient obtained abortion medication via mail
order or Internet web site, website, and if so, information
identifying the source of the medication.
(9) (10) Whether the complication was previously managed by the
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


abortion provider or the abortion provider's required back-up
physician.
(10) (11) The name of the medications taken by the patient as part
of the pharmaceutical abortion regimen, if any.
(11) (12) A list of each diagnosed complication.
(12) (13) A list of each treated complication, with a description of
the treatment provided.
(13) (14) Whether the patient's visit to treat the complications was
the original visit or a follow-up visit.
(14) (15) The date of each follow-up visit, if any.
(15) (16) A list of each complication diagnosed at a follow-up
visit, if any.
(16) (17) A list of each complication treated at a follow-up visit,
if any.
(18) The location, including the facility name and city or town,
where the patient presented for treatment of the abortion
complication.
(19) The full name of the health care provider who provided
treatment for the abortion complication.
(f) The state department shall send each report received under
this section to the office of the inspector general.
(f) (g) On a quarterly basis, the state department shall compile a
public report summarizing the information collected under this section.
The report must include statistics for the previous calendar quarter,
with updated information for the most recent calendar quarter.
(g) (h) The state department shall summarize the aggregate data
from the data submitted under this section and submit the data, on or
before June 30 of each year, to the United States Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention for its inclusion in the annual Vital Statistics
Report.
(h) (i) The state department shall ensure that no identifying
information of a pregnant woman is included in the report described in
subsection (f). (g).
(i) (j) This subsection applies after August 31, 2020. Each failure to
report an abortion complication as required under this section is a Class
B misdemeanor.
(j) (k) The state department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this section.
SECTION 10. IC 16-34-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.179-2022(ss),
SECTION 29, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A pregnant woman who has an abortion
under this article has the right to have the hospital or ambulatory
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


outpatient surgical center dispose of the aborted fetus by interment in
compliance with IC 23-14-54, or cremation through a licensee (as
defined in IC 25-15-2-19) and in compliance with IC 23-14-31. The
pregnant woman who selects to have the hospital or ambulatory
outpatient surgical center dispose of the aborted fetus has the right to
ask which method will be used by the hospital or ambulatory outpatient
surgical center.
(b) After receiving the notification and information required by
IC 16-34-2-1.1(a)(2)(H) and IC 16-34-2-1.1(a)(2)(I), and
IC 16-34-2-1.1(a)(2)(J), the pregnant woman shall inform the hospital
or ambulatory outpatient surgical center:
(1) in writing; and
(2) on a form prescribed by the state department;
of the pregnant woman's decision for final disposition of the aborted
fetus by cremation or interment, and, in an abortion induced by an
abortion inducing drug, whether the pregnant woman will return the
aborted fetus to the hospital or ambulatory outpatient surgical center
for disposition by interment in compliance with IC 23-14-54, or
cremation through a licensee (as defined in IC 25-15-2-19) and in
compliance with IC 23-14-31.
(c) If the pregnant woman is a minor, the hospital or ambulatory
outpatient surgical center shall obtain parental consent in the
disposition of the aborted fetus unless the minor has received a waiver
of parental consent under IC 16-34-2-4.
(d) The hospital or ambulatory outpatient surgical center shall
document the pregnant woman's decision concerning disposition of the
aborted fetus in the pregnant woman's medical record.
(e) In the case of an abortion induced by an abortion inducing drug,
the pregnant woman may return the aborted fetus to the hospital or
ambulatory outpatient surgical center for disposition by interment in
compliance with IC 23-14-54, or cremation through a licensee (as
defined in IC 25-15-2-19) and in compliance with IC 23-14-31.
SECTION 11. IC 16-34-3-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.179-2022(ss),
SECTION 31, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) A hospital or ambulatory outpatient surgical
center having possession of an aborted fetus shall provide for the final
disposition of the aborted fetus. The burial transit permit requirements
of IC 16-37-3 apply to the final disposition of an aborted fetus, which
must be interred or cremated. However:
(1) a person is not required to designate a name for the aborted
fetus on the burial transit permit and the space for a name may
remain blank; and
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


(2) any information submitted under this section that may be used
to identify the pregnant woman is confidential and must be
redacted from any public records maintained under IC 16-37-3.
Aborted fetuses may be cremated by simultaneous cremation.
(b) If the hospital or ambulatory outpatient surgical center conducts
the cremation of aborted fetal remains on site, the hospital or
ambulatory outpatient surgical center must comply with all state laws
concerning the cremation of human remains as prescribed in
IC 23-14-31. The hospital or ambulatory outpatient surgical center
must make the onsite cremation equipment available to the state
department for inspection at the time the hospital or ambulatory
outpatient surgical center is inspected. When the hospital or
ambulatory outpatient surgical center contracts with a licensed funeral
home for the disposal of the aborted fetal remains, the contract must be
made available for review by the state department at the time the
hospital or ambulatory outpatient surgical center is inspected.
(c) Except in extraordinary circumstances where the required
information is unavailable or unknown, a burial transit permit issued
under IC 16-37-3 that includes multiple fetal remains must be
accompanied by a log prescribed by the state department containing the
following information about each fetus included under the burial transit
permit:
(1) The date of the abortion.
(2) Whether the abortion was surgical or induced by an abortion
inducing drug.
(3) (2) The name of the funeral director licensee who will be
retrieving the aborted fetus.
(4) In the case of an abortion induced by an abortion inducing
drug:
(A) whether the pregnant woman will cremate or inter the
fetus, or will return the fetus to the hospital or ambulatory
outpatient surgical center for disposition; and
(B) if the pregnant woman returns the fetus to the hospital or
ambulatory outpatient surgical center, whether the returned
fetus is included in the burial transit permit.
The hospital or ambulatory outpatient surgical center must keep a copy
of the burial transit permit and accompanying log in a permanent file.
(d) Each time the fetal remains are transported from one entity to
another for disposition, the entity receiving the fetal remains must
confirm that the number of fetal remains matches the information
contained in the burial transit permit and accompanying log. After final
disposition, a copy of the log will be sent back to the hospital or
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


ambulatory outpatient surgical center. The final log will be attached to
the original log described in subsection (c) and will be made available
for review by the state department at the time of inspection.
(e) A hospital or ambulatory outpatient surgical center is responsible
for demonstrating to the state department that the hospital or
ambulatory outpatient surgical center has complied with the protocol
provided in this section.
(f) A certificate of stillbirth is not required to be issued for an
aborted fetus with a gestational age of less than twenty (20) weeks of
age.
(g) IC 23-14-31-26, IC 23-14-55-2, IC 25-15-9-18, and
IC 29-2-19-17 concerning the authorization of disposition of human
remains apply to this section.
SECTION 12. IC 16-34-7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 7. Abortion Inducing Drugs
Sec. 1. (a) This chapter does not apply to and a civil action
under this chapter may not be brought against:
(1) a hospital or health facility licensed, owned, maintained,
or operated by the state;
(2) a physician or health care provider who is:
(A) licensed by the state; and
(B) located in Indiana;
(3) an Internet service provider or an affiliate of subsidiary of
an Internet service provider;
(4) an Internet service engine;
(5) a cloud service provider providing access or connection to
or from:
(A) a website;
(B) other information or content on the Internet;
(C) a facility, system, or network that is not under the
provider's control, including:
(i) transmission;
(ii) downloading;
(iii) intermediate storage; or
(iv) access software.
(b) This chapter does not apply to the transport of an abortion
inducing drug from a person in another state in continuous transit
through Indiana to a person in another state.
Sec. 2. This chapter may not be construed to require the actual
performance, inducement, or attempted performance of an
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


abortion in order for a person to bring a civil action under this
chapter.
Sec. 3. The following definitions apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Delivery network company" has the meaning set forth in
IC 8-2.1-17-5.3.
(2) "DNC driver" has the meaning set forth in IC 8-2.1-17-5.7.
(3) "Health facility" means a building, a structure, an
institution, or other place for the reception, accommodation,
board, care, or treatment extending beyond a continuous
twenty-four (24) hour period in a week of more than four (4)
individuals who need or desire such services because of
physical or mental illness, infirmity, or impairment. The term
does not include a hospital.
(4) "Physician" means an individual licensed to practice
medicine in Indiana, include a medical doctor and a doctor of
osteopathic medicine.
Sec. 4. (a) Except as provided by subsection (b), a person may
not knowingly or intentionally:
(1) manufacture, distribute, or possess an abortion inducing
drug; or
(2) mail, transport, deliver, prescribe, or provide an abortion
inducing drug in any manner to or from any person or
location in Indiana.
(b) Subsection (a) does not prohibit:
(1) speech or conduct protected by the First Amendment to
the Constitution of the United States, as made applicable to
the states through the United States Supreme Court's
interpretation of the Fourteenth Amendment to the
Constitution of the United States, or protected by Article 1,
Section 9 of the Constitution of the State of Indiana;
(2) conduct that a pregnant woman takes in the course of
aborting or attempting to abort the woman's unborn child;
(3) the manufacture, distribution, mailing, transport, delivery,
prescribing, provision, or possession of an abortion inducing
drug solely for purposes that do not include performing,
inducing, attempting, assisting, or aiding or abetting an illegal
abortion; or
(4) conduct that a person takes under the direction of a
federal agency, contractor, or employee to carry out a duty
under federal law, if prohibiting that conduct would violate
the doctrine of preemption or intergovernmental immunity.
Sec. 5. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the prohibitions in
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


section 4 of this chapter may be enforced only through a wrongful
death action brought under section 6 of this chapter or a qui tam
action brought under section 9 of this chapter.
(b) No other direct or indirect enforcement of section 4 of this
chapter may be taken or threatened by:
(1) the State of Indiana;
(2) a political subdivision of the state;
(3) a prosecuting attorney;
(4) a county attorney;
(5) any officer or employee of the state; or
(6) any officer or employee of a political subdivision of the
state;
against any person, except through a wrongful death action
brought under section 6 of this chapter or a qui tam action brought
under section 9 of this chapter.
(c) This section does not preclude or limit the enforcement of
any other law or regulation against conduct that is independently
prohibited by the other law or regulation and that would remain
prohibited by the other law or regulation in the absence of section
4 of this chapter.
Sec. 6. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as
provided in subsections (b) and (f), a person who manufactures,
distributes, mails, transports, delivers, prescribes, or provides an
abortion inducing drug, or who aids or abets the manufacture,
distribution, mailing, transportation, delivery, prescription, or
provision of an abortion inducing drug, is strictly, absolutely, and
jointly and severally liable for:
(1) the wrongful death of an unborn child or pregnant woman
from the use of the abortion inducing drug; and
(2) personal injury of an unborn child or pregnant woman
from the use of the abortion inducing drug.
(b) A claimant may not bring an action under this section if the
action is preempted by 47 U.S.C. 230(c).
(c) A person who engages in conduct described by subsection (a)
is liable for damages resulting from the death or personal injury
sustained by an unborn child or pregnant woman if the person's
conduct contributed in any way to the death or injury, regardless
of whether the person's conduct was the actual or proximate cause
of the death or injury.
(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the mother or father of an
unborn child may bring a civil action under this section for the
wrongful death of the unborn child from the use of an abortion
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


inducing drug, regardless of whether the other parent brings a civil
action for the wrongful death. The biological father of an unborn
child may bring the action regardless of whether the father was
married to the unborn child's mother at the time of the unborn
child's conception or death.
(e) Notwithstanding any other law, a civil action may not be
brought under this section:
(1) against the woman who used or sought to obtain abortion
inducing drugs to abort or attempt to abort her unborn child;
(2) against a person that acted under the direction of a federal
agency, contractor, or employee who is carrying out duties
under federal law if the imposition of liability would violate
the doctrine of preemption or intergovernmental immunity;
(3) by any person who has committed a sex crime as defined
in IC 35-42-4, or by another person who acts in concert or
participation with such a person;
(4) against a transportation network company or a driver for
using a transportation network company's digital network to
provide a digitally prearranged ride;
(5) against a delivery network company or a DNC driver for
using a delivery network company's digital network to
provide a digitally prearranged delivery;
(6) against a person described in section 1 of this chapter; or
(7) against a common carrier that took every reasonable
precaution to ensure that the common carrier would not
manufacture, distribute, mail, transport, deliver, prescribe,
provide, possess, or aid or abet the manufacture, distribution,
mailing, transportation, delivery, prescription, provision, or
possession of abortion inducing drugs for the purpose of
performing, inducing, attempting, or assisting an illegal
abortion, including by adopting a policy that the common
carrier will not manufacture, distribute, mail, transport,
deliver, prescribe, provide, possess, or aid or abet the
manufacture, distribution, mailing, transportation, delivery,
prescription, provision, or possession of abortion inducing
drugs for this purpose.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, including Trial Rule 23 of the
Indiana Rules of Trial Procedure, an action brought under this
section may not be litigated on behalf of a claimant class or a
defendant class, and a court may not certify a class in the action.
Sec. 7. (a) It is an affirmative defense to an action brought under
section 6 of this chapter that the defendant:
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


(1) was unaware the defendant was engaged in the conduct
described by section 6(a) of this chapter; and
(2) took every reasonable precaution to ensure the defendant
would not manufacture, distribute, mail, transport, deliver,
prescribe, provide, or possess abortion inducing drugs.
(b) A defendant has the burden of proving an affirmative
defense under subsection (a) by a preponderance of the evidence.
(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the following are not a
defense to an action brought under section 6 of this chapter:
(1) A defendant's ignorance or mistake of law, including a
defendant's mistaken belief that the requirements or
provisions of this chapter are unconstitutional or were
unconstitutional.
(2) A defendant's reliance on a court decision that has been
vacated, reversed, or overruled on appeal or by a subsequent
court, even if the court decision had not been vacated,
reversed, or overruled when the cause of action accrued.
(3) A defendant's reliance on a state or federal court decision
that is not binding on the court in which the action has been
brought.
(4) A defendant's reliance on a federal statute, agency rule or
action, or treaty that has been repealed, superseded, or
declared invalid or unconstitutional, even if the federal
statute, agency rule or action, or treaty had not been repealed,
superseded, or declared invalid or unconstitutional when the
cause of action accrued.
(5) The laws of another state or jurisdiction, including an
abortion shield law, unless the Constitution of the State of
Indiana or federal law compels the court to enforce that law.
(6) Nonmutual issue preclusion or nonmutual claim
preclusion.
(7) The consent of the claimant or the unborn child's mother
to the abortion.
(8) Contributory or comparative negligence.
(9) Assumption of risk.
(10) Lack of actual or proximate cause.
(11) Sovereign immunity, governmental immunity, or official
immunity, except that sovereign immunity, governmental
immunity, or official immunity is not waived for:
(A) a hospital owned and operated by the state that
facilitates or makes available abortion inducing drugs
solely for purposes that do not include performing,
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


inducing, attempting, assisting, or aiding or abetting an
illegal abortion; or
(B) a political subdivision, including a hospital district, that
facilitates or makes available abortion inducing drugs
solely for purposes that do not include performing,
inducing, attempting, assisting, or aiding or abetting an
illegal abortion.
(12) A claim that the enforcement of this chapter or the
imposition of civil liability against the defendant will violate
the constitutional or federally protected rights of third
parties.
Sec. 8. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as
provided in subsection (b), if a claimant who brings an action
under section 6 of this chapter is unable to identify the specific
manufacturer of the abortion inducing drug that caused the death
or injury that is the basis for the action, the liability is apportioned
among all manufacturers of abortion inducing drugs in proportion
to each manufacturer's share of the national market for abortion
inducing drugs at the time the death or injury occurred.
(b) A manufacturer is not subject to liability under this section
if it manufactures abortion inducing drugs solely for purposes that
do not include performing, inducing, attempting, or assisting, or
aiding or abetting an illegal abortion.
Sec. 9. (a) A person, other than the state of Indiana, a political
subdivision of the state, or an officer or employee of the state or a
political subdivision of the state, has standing to bring and may
bring a qui tam action against any person who:
(1) violates section 4 of this chapter; or
(2) intends to violate section 4 of this chapter.
(b) An action brought under this section must be brought in the
name of the qui tam relator, who is an assignee of the state's claim
for relief. Notwithstanding any other law, the transfer of the state's
claim to the qui tam relator is absolute, with the state retaining no
interest in the subject matter of the claim.
(c) A qui tam relator may not bring an action under this section
if the action is preempted by 47 U.S.C. 230(c).
(d) A qui tam action may not be brought under this section:
(1) against a woman for using, obtaining, or seeking to obtain
abortion inducing drugs to abort or attempt to abort her
unborn child;
(2) against a person acting under the direction of a federal
agency, contractor, or employee who is carrying out a duty
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


under federal law if the imposition of liability would violate
the doctrine of preemption or intergovernmental immunity;
(3) by any person who has committed a sex crime as defined
in IC 35-42-4, or by another person who acts in concert or
participation with such a person;
(4) against a transportation network company or a driver for
using a transportation network company's digital network to
provide a digitally prearranged ride;
(5) against a delivery network company or a DNC driver for
using a delivery network company's digital network to
provide a digitally prearranged delivery;
(6) against a person described in section 1 of this chapter; or
(7) against a common carrier that took reasonable
precautions to ensure that the common carrier would not
manufacture, distribute, mail, transport, deliver, prescribe,
provide, possess, or aid or abet the manufacture, distribution,
mailing, transportation, delivery, prescription, provision, or
possession of abortion inducing drugs for the purpose of
performing, inducing, attempting, or assisting an illegal
abortion, including by adopting a policy that the common
carrier will not manufacture, distribute, mail, transport,
deliver, prescribe, provide, possess, or aid or abet the
manufacture, distribution, mailing, transportation, delivery,
prescription, provision, or possession of abortion inducing
drugs for this purpose.
(e) Notwithstanding any other law, including Trial Rule 23 of
the Indiana Rules of Trial Procedure, an action brought under this
section may not be litigated on behalf of a claimant class or a
defendant class, and a court may not certify a class in the action.
Sec. 10. (a) It is an affirmative defense to an action brought
under section 9 of this chapter that the defendant:
(1) was unaware the defendant was engaged in the conduct
prohibited by section 4 of this chapter; and
(2) took reasonable precautions to ensure the defendant would
not violate section 4 of this chapter.
(b) The defendant has the burden of proving an affirmative
defense under this section by a preponderance of the evidence.
(c) The following are not defenses to an action brought under
section 9 of this chapter:
(1) A defendant's ignorance or mistake of law, including a
defendant's mistaken belief that the requirements or
provisions of this chapter are unconstitutional or were
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


unconstitutional.
(2) A defendant's reliance on a court decision that has been
vacated, reversed, or overruled on appeal or by a subsequent
court, even if the court decision had not been vacated,
reversed, or overruled when the cause of action accrued.
(3) A defendant's reliance on a state or federal court decision
that is not binding on the court in which the action has been
brought.
(4) A defendant's reliance on a federal agency rule or action
that has been repealed, superseded, or declared invalid or
unconstitutional, even if the federal agency rule or action had
not been repealed, superseded, or declared invalid or
unconstitutional when the cause of action accrued.
(5) The laws of another state or jurisdiction, including an
abortion shield law, unless the Constitution of the State of
Indiana or federal law compels the court to enforce that law.
(6) Nonmutual issue preclusion or nonmutual claim
preclusion.
(7) Sovereign immunity, governmental immunity, or official
immunity, other than sovereign immunity, governmental
immunity, or official immunity applicable to:
(A) a hospital owned and operated by the state that
facilitates or makes available abortion inducing drugs
solely for purposes that do not include performing,
inducing, attempting, assisting, or aiding or abetting an
illegal abortion; or
(B) a political subdivision, including a hospital district, that
facilitates or makes available abortion inducing drugs
solely for purposes that do not include performing,
inducing, attempting, assisting, or aiding or abetting an
illegal abortion.
(8) A claim that the enforcement of this chapter or the
imposition of civil liability against the defendant will violate
the constitutional or federally protected rights of third
parties.
(9) Consent to the abortion by the claimant or the unborn
child's mother.
Sec. 11. (a) Notwithstanding any other law and except as
provided in subsection (b), if a qui tam relator prevails in an action
brought under section 9 of this chapter, the court shall award to
the relator:
(1) injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the defendant from
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


violating section 4 of this chapter;
(2) an amount of not less than one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) for each violation of section 4 of this chapter; and
(3) costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(b) A court may not award relief under subsection (a)(2) or
(a)(3) in response to a violation of section 4 of this chapter if the
defendant demonstrates that:
(1) a court previously ordered the defendant to pay an amount
under subsection (a)(2) in another action for that particular
violation; and
(2) the court order described by subdivision (1) has not been
vacated, reversed, or overturned.
(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a court may not award costs
or attorney's fees to a defendant against whom an action is brought
under section 6 or 9 of this chapter except:
(1) in response to frivolous, malicious, or bad faith conduct;
or
(2) as required by federal law.
Sec. 12. Notwithstanding any other law, a person may bring an
action under section 6 or 9 of this chapter not later than twenty
(20) years after the date on which the cause of action accrues.
Sec. 13. (a) It is an affirmative defense to an action brought
under section 6 or 9 of this chapter that:
(1) the imposition of civil liability on the defendant will violate
the defendant's rights under federal law, including the
Constitution of the United States;
(2) the defendant:
(A) has standing to assert the rights of a third party under
the tests for third party standing established by the United
States Supreme Court; and
(B) demonstrates that the imposition of civil liability on the
defendant will violate the third party's rights under federal
law, including the Constitution of the United States;
(3) the imposition of civil liability on the defendant will violate
the defendant's rights under the Constitution of the State of
Indiana; or
(4) the imposition of civil liability on the defendant will violate
limits on extraterritorial jurisdiction imposed by the
Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of the
State of Indiana.
(b) The defendant has the burden of proving an affirmative
defense under subsection (a) by a preponderance of the evidence.
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


(c) Notwithstanding any other law, this chapter does not impose
liability for:
(1) death or personal injury resulting from an abortion
described in IC 16-34-2-1(a)(1), IC 16-34-2-1(a)(2), or
IC 16-34-2-1(a)(3);
(2) the manufacture, distribution, mailing, transportation,
delivery, prescription, provision, or possession of an abortion
inducing drug for the purpose of performing, inducing,
attempting, or assisting, or aiding or abetting an abortion
described in IC 16-34-2-1(a)(1), IC 16-34-2-1(a)(2), or
IC 16-34-2-1(a)(3);
(3) speech or conduct protected by the First Amendment to
the Constitution of the United States, as made applicable to
the states through the United States Supreme Court's
interpretation of the Fourteenth Amendment to the
Constitution of the United States, or protected by Article 1,
Section 9 of the Constitution of the State of Indiana;
(4) conduct that this state is prohibited from regulating under
the Constitution of the State of Indiana or federal law,
including the Constitution of the United States;
(5) conduct taken by a pregnant woman in the course of
aborting or seeking to abort her unborn child; or
(6) conduct that a person engages in under the direction of a
federal agency, contractor, or employee to carry out a duty
under federal law, if a prohibition on that conduct would
violate the doctrine of preemption or intergovernmental
immunity.
Sec. 14. Notwithstanding any other law, a waiver or purported
waiver of the right to bring an action under section 6 or 9 of this
chapter is void as against public policy and is not enforceable in
any court.
Sec. 15. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the courts of the
state have personal jurisdiction over a defendant sued under
section 6 or 9 of this chapter to the maximum extent permitted by
the Fourteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States
and the defendant may be served outside Indiana.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law, Indiana law applies to the
use of an abortion inducing drug by a resident, regardless of where
the use of the drug occurs, and to an action brought under section
6 or 9 of this chapter, to the maximum extent permitted by the
Constitution of the State of Indiana and federal law, including the
Constitution of the United States.
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


(c) Notwithstanding any other law, any contractual
choice-of-law provision that requires or purports to require
application of the laws of a different jurisdiction is void based on
the state's public policy and is not enforceable in any court.
(d) Notwithstanding any other law, IC 34-7-7 and IC 34-13-9 do
not apply to an action brought under section 6 or 9 of this chapter.
(e) Notwithstanding any other law, a court may not apply the
law of another state or jurisdiction to an action brought under
section 6 or 9 of this chapter unless the Constitution of the State of
Indiana or federal law compels the court to apply that law.
Sec. 16. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the state, a political
subdivision of the state, or an officer or employee of the state or a
political subdivision of the state may not:
(1) act in concert or participation with a claimant bringing an
action under section 6 or 9 of this chapter;
(2) establish or attempt to establish any type of agency or
fiduciary relationship with a claimant bringing an action
under section 6 or 9 of this chapter;
(3) attempt to control or influence a person's decision to bring
an action under section 6 or 9 of this chapter or that person's
conduct of the litigation; or
(4) intervene in an action brought under section 6 or 9 of this
chapter
(b) This section does not prohibit the state, a political
subdivision of the state, or an officer or employee of the state or a
political subdivision of the state from filing an amicus curiae brief
in an action brought under section 6 or 9 of this chapter if the state,
the political subdivision, the officer, or the employee does not act
in concert or participation with the claimant who brings the action.
Sec. 17. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, including the
Indiana Rules of Trial Procedure, an action brought under section
6 or 9 of this chapter may be brought in:
(1) the county in which all or a substantial part of the events
or omissions giving rise to the claim occurred;
(2) the county of a defendant's residence at the time the cause
of action accrued if a defendant is an individual;
(3) the county of the principal office in the state of a defendant
that is not an individual; or
(4) the county of the claimant's residence if the claimant is an
individual residing in Indiana.
(b) If an action brought under section 6 or 9 of this chapter is
brought in a venue described by subsection (a), the action may not
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


be transferred to a different venue without the written consent of
all parties.
(c) Notwithstanding any other law, any contractual
choice-of-forum provision that requires or purports to require an
action brought under section 6 or 9 of this chapter to be litigated
in a particular forum is void based on the state's public policy and
is not enforceable in any court.
Sec. 18. (a) The attorney general has parens patriae standing to
bring an action under this section on behalf of unborn children of
residents of Indiana.
(b) Except as provided by subsection (c), the attorney general
may bring an action for damages or injunctive relief on behalf of
an unborn child of a resident of Indiana against any person who,
with the intent of performing, inducing, attempting, assisting, or
aiding or abetting an illegal abortion:
(1) violates 18 U.S.C. 1461 through 18 U.S.C. 1462 by using
the mails for the mailing, carriage in the mails, or delivery of:
(A) any article or thing designed, adapted, or intended for
producing abortion; or
(B) any article, instrument, substance, drug, medicine, or
thing which is advertised or described in a manner
calculated to lead another to use or apply it for producing
abortion;
(2) violates 18 U.S.C. 1462 by:
(A) using any express company or other common carrier
or interactive computer service for carriage in interstate
or foreign commerce of any drug, medicine, article, or
thing designed, adapted, or intended for producing
abortion; or
(B) knowingly taking or receiving, from such express
company or other common carrier or interactive computer
service, any matter or thing described in subdivision (1); or
(3) aids or abets the violations of 18 U.S.C. 1461 or 18 U.S.C.
1462 described in subdivisions (1) and (2).
(c) Notwithstanding any other law, an action under this section
may not be brought:
(1) against a woman for conduct taken in the course of
aborting or seeking to abort her unborn child;
(2) against a person that acted under the direction of a federal
agency, contractor, or employee who is carrying out duties
under federal law if the imposition of liability would violate
the doctrine of preemption or intergovernmental immunity;
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


(3) against a transportation network company or a driver for
using a transportation network company's digital network to
provide a digitally prearranged ride;
(4) against a delivery network company or a DNC driver for
using a delivery network company's digital network to
provide a digitally prearranged delivery;
(5) against a person described in section 1 of this chapter; or
(6) against a common carrier that took every reasonable
precaution to ensure that the common carrier would not
manufacture, distribute, mail, transport, deliver, prescribe,
provide, possess, or aid or abet the manufacture, distribution,
mailing, transportation, delivery, prescription, provision, or
possession of abortion inducing drugs for the purpose of
performing, inducing, attempting, or assisting an illegal
abortion, including by adopting a policy that the common
carrier will not manufacture, distribute, mail, transport,
deliver, prescribe, provide, possess, or aid or abet the
manufacture, distribution, mailing, transportation, delivery,
prescription, provision, or possession of abortion inducing
drugs for this purpose.
Sec. 19. (a) For purposes of this section, "clawback provision"
refers to any law of another state or jurisdiction that authorizes the
bringing of a civil action against a person for:
(1) bringing or engaging in an action authorized by this
chapter, including an action brought under section 6, 9, or 18
of this chapter;
(2) bringing or engaging in an action that alleges a violation
of any federal or state abortion law;
(3) attempting, intending, or threatening to bring or engage in
an action described by subdivision (1) or (2); or
(4) providing legal representation or any type of assistance to
a person who brings or engages in an action described by
subdivision (1) or (2).
(b) Notwithstanding any other law and except as otherwise
provided by federal law or the Constitution of the State of Indiana,
Indiana law applies to:
(1) conduct described by subsection (a);
(2) an action brought against a person for engaging in conduct
described by subsection (a);
(3) an action brought under a clawback provision against a
resident of Indiana; and
(4) an action brought under subsection (f).
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


(c) Notwithstanding any other law, in an action described by
subsection (a)(1), the court shall, on request, issue a temporary,
preliminary, or permanent injunction that restrains each
defendant in the action, each person in privity with the defendant,
and each person with whom the defendant is in active concert or
participation from:
(1) bringing an action under any clawback provision against
a claimant or prosecutor, a person in privity with the claimant
or prosecutor, or a person providing legal representation or
any type of assistance to the claimant or prosecutor; and
(2) continuing to litigate an action under any clawback
provision that has been brought against a claimant or
prosecutor, a person in privity with the claimant or
prosecutor, or a person providing legal representation or any
type of assistance to the claimant or prosecutor.
(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the doctrines of res judicata
and collateral estoppel preclude a defendant against whom a
judgment is entered in an action described by subsection (a)(1) and
each person in privity with the defendant from litigating or
relitigating any claim or issue under any clawback provision
against a claimant, prosecutor, or person in privity with the
claimant or prosecutor that was raised or could have been raised
as a claim, cross-claim, counterclaim, or affirmative defense under
the Federal or Indiana Rules of Civil Procedure.
(e) Notwithstanding any other law, a court of Indiana may not
enforce an out-of-state judgment obtained in an action brought
under a clawback provision unless federal law or the Constitution
of the State of Indiana requires the court to enforce the judgment.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, if an action is brought or
judgment is entered against a person under a clawback provision
based wholly or partly on the person's decision to engage in
conduct described by subsection (a), that person is entitled to
injunctive relief and damages from any person who brought the
action or obtained the judgment or who sought to enforce the
judgment. Notwithstanding any other law, the relief described by
this subsection must include:
(1) compensatory damages, including money damages in an
amount equal to the judgment damages and costs, expenses,
and reasonable attorney's fees spent in defending the action;
(2) costs, expenses, and reasonable attorney's fees incurred in
bringing an action under this subsection;
(3) additional amounts consisting of the greater of:
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


(A) twice the sum of the damages, costs, expenses, and fees
described by subdivisions (1) and (2); or
(B) one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000); and
(4) injunctive relief that restrains each person who brought
the action under the clawback provision, each person in
privity with the person, and each person acting in concert or
participation with the person from:
(A) bringing further actions under any clawback provision
against the person against whom the action was brought,
each person in privity with the person, or any person
providing legal representation or any type of assistance to
the person;
(B) continuing to litigate any actions brought under a
clawback provision against the persons described by clause
(A); and
(C) enforcing or attempting to enforce any judgment
obtained in any actions brought under a clawback
provision against the persons described by clause (A).
(g) It is not a defense to an action brought under subsection (f)
that:
(1) the claimant failed to seek recovery under subsection (f) in
an action brought against the claimant under a clawback
provision; or
(2) a court in a preceding action brought against the claimant
declined to recognize or enforce subsection (f) or held any
provision of that subsection invalid, unconstitutional, or
preempted by federal law, notwithstanding the doctrines of
issue or claim preclusion.
(h) Notwithstanding any other law, IC 34-7-7 and IC 34-13-9 do
not apply to an action brought under subsection (f).
Sec. 20. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a person, including
an entity, attorney, or law firm, who seeks declaratory or
injunctive relief to prevent the state, a political subdivision of the
state, an officer, employee, or agent of the state or a political
subdivision of the state, or any person from enforcing or bringing
an action to enforce a law, including a statute, ordinance, rule, or
regulation, that regulates or restricts abortion or that limits
taxpayer funding for persons performing or promoting abortions
in any state or federal court, or who represents a litigant seeking
such relief in any state or federal court, is jointly and severally
liable to pay the costs and reasonable attorney's fees of the
prevailing party, including the costs and reasonable attorney's fees
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


the prevailing party incurs in its efforts to recover costs and fees.
(b) For purposes of this section, a party is considered a
prevailing party if:
(1) a state or federal court dismisses a claim or cause of action
brought against the party by a litigant that seeks the
declaratory or injunctive relief described by subsection (a),
regardless of the reason for the dismissal;
(2) a state or federal court enters judgment in the party's
favor on that claim or cause of action; or
(3) the litigant that seeks the declaratory or injunctive relief
described by subsection (a) voluntarily dismisses or nonsuits
its claims against the party under Rule 41 of the Federal Rules
of Civil Procedure, or any other procedural rule.
(c) A prevailing party may recover costs and reasonable
attorney's fees under this section only to the extent that the costs
and attorney's fees were incurred while defending claims or causes
of action on which the party prevailed.
(d) Regardless of whether a prevailing party sought to recover
costs or attorney's fees in the underlying action, a prevailing party
under this section may bring a civil action to recover costs and
attorney's fees against a person, including an entity, attorney, or
law firm, who sought declaratory or injunctive relief described by
subsection (a) not later than three (3) years after the date on which,
as applicable:
(1) the dismissal or judgment described by subsection (b)
becomes final on the conclusion of appellate review; or
(2) the time for seeking appellate review expires.
(e) It is not a defense to a civil action brought under subsection
(d) that:
(1) a prevailing party under this section failed to seek
recovery of costs or attorney's fees in the underlying action;
(2) the court in the underlying action declined to recognize or
enforce this section; or
(3) the court in the underlying action held that any provisions
of this section are invalid, unconstitutional, or preempted by
federal law, notwithstanding the doctrine of issue or claim
preclusion.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, a civil action brought under
subsection (d) may be brought in:
(1) the county in which all or a substantial part of the events
or omissions giving rise to the claim occurred;
(2) the county of residence of a defendant at the time the cause
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


of action accrued, if the defendant is an individual;
(3) the county of the principal office in the state of a defendant
that is not an individual; or
(4) the county of residence of the claimant, if the claimant is
an individual residing in Indiana.
(g) If a civil action is brought under subsection (d) in a venue
described by subsection (f), the action may not be transferred to a
different venue without the written consent of all parties.
(h) Notwithstanding any other law, any contractual
choice-of-forum provision that purports to require a civil action
under subsection (d) be litigated in another forum is void based on
the state's public policy and is not enforceable in any state or
federal court.
(i) Notwithstanding any other law, IC 34-7-7 and IC 34-13-9 do
not apply to an action brought under subsection (d).
(j) A court may not award attorney's fees or costs under this
section if the award would violate:
(1) the Constitution of the State of Indiana;
(2) the Constitution of the United States; or
(3) federal law.
Sec. 21. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the state has
sovereign immunity, a political subdivision of the state has
governmental immunity, and an officer or employee of the state or
a political subdivision of the state has official immunity (as well as
sovereign or governmental immunity, as appropriate) in an action,
claim, counterclaim, or any other type of legal or equitable action
that:
(1) challenges the validity of any provision or application of
this chapter, on constitutional grounds or otherwise; or
(2) seeks to prevent or enjoin the state, a political subdivision
of the state, or an officer, employee, or agent of the state or a
political subdivision of the state from:
(A) enforcing any provision or application of this chapter;
or
(B) filing, hearing, adjudicating, or docketing an action
brought under section 6, 9, 18, or 20 of this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the immunities described in
or conferred by this section apply in court, and in every type of
adjudicative proceeding.
(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a provision of Indiana law
may not be construed to waive or abrogate an immunity conferred
by this section unless it expressly waives or abrogates immunity
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


with specific reference to this section.
(d) Notwithstanding any other law, an attorney representing the
state, a political subdivision of the state, or an officer or employee
of the state or a political subdivision of the state may not waive an
immunity conferred by this section or take an action that would
result in a waiver of that immunity. A purported waiver or action
described by this subsection is considered void and an ultra vires
act.
Sec. 22. Notwithstanding any other law, including IC 34-14-1, a
court of the state does not have jurisdiction to consider and may
not award relief under any action, claim, or counterclaim that:
(1) seeks declaratory or injunctive relief, or any type of writ,
including a writ of prohibition, that would pronounce any
provision or application of this article invalid or
unconstitutional; or
(2) would restrain the state, a political subdivision of the state,
an officer, employee, or agent of the state or a political
subdivision of the state, or any person from:
(A) enforcing any provision or application of this article;
or
(B) filing, hearing, adjudicating, or docketing an action
brought under section 6, 9, 18, or 20 of this chapter.
Sec. 23. This chapter may not be construed to prevent a litigant
from asserting the invalidity or unconstitutionality of a provision
or application of this chapter as a defense to an action, claim, or
counterclaim brought against the litigant.
SECTION 13. IC 34-6-2.1-84, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 274, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 84. (a) "Health care services":
(1) except as provided in subdivision (2), for purposes of
IC 34-30-13, has the meaning set forth in IC 27-13-1-18(a); and
(2) for purposes of IC 34-30-13-1.2, means only noninvasive
examinations, treatments, and procedures and the following
invasive procedures:
(A) Routine dental services.
(B) Injections.
(C) Suturing of minor lacerations.
(D) Incisions of boils or superficial abscesses.
The term does not include performance of an abortion, including
abortion by surgical means, by use of an abortion inducing drug
in violation of IC 16-34-7, or by prescribing a controlled
substance or scheduled drug under IC 35-48.
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


(b) "Health care services", for purposes of IC 34-30-13.5, means:
(1) any services provided by an individual licensed under:
(A) IC 25-2.5;
(B) IC 25-10;
(C) IC 25-13;
(D) IC 25-14;
(E) IC 25-19;
(F) IC 25-22.5;
(G) IC 25-23;
(H) IC 25-23.5;
(I) IC 25-23.6;
(J) IC 25-24;
(K) IC 25-26;
(L) IC 25-27;
(M) IC 25-27.5;
(N) IC 25-29;
(O) IC 25-33;
(P) IC 25-34.5; or
(Q) IC 25-35.6;
(2) services provided as the result of hospitalization, to an
individual admitted to a health facility licensed under IC 16-28,
or to a person residing in a housing with services establishment
(as defined by IC 12-10-15-3);
(3) services incidental to the furnishing of services described in
subdivisions subdivision (1) or (2);
(4) any services by individuals:
(A) licensed as paramedics;
(B) certified as advanced emergency medical technicians; or
(C) certified as emergency medical technicians under
IC 16-31;
(5) any services provided by individuals certified as emergency
medical responders under IC 16-31;
(6) any services provided by certified health care professionals
who are registered with the Indiana department of health and the
certified health care professions commission, including:
(A) certified nurse aides certified under IC 16-27.5-3;
(B) qualified medication aides certified under IC 16-27.5-4;
and
(C) home health aides registered under rules adopted under
IC 16-27.5-5;
(7) any services provided by unlicensed health care professionals
who have successfully completed any applicable training required
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


by the Indiana department of health;
(8) any services provided by health care volunteers who are
permitted to practice during an event that is declared a disaster
emergency under IC 10-14-3-12 to respond to COVID-19;
(9) any services provided by individuals with provisional or
temporary licenses who are permitted to practice during an event
that is declared a disaster emergency under IC 10-14-3-12 to
respond to COVID-19; or
(10) any other services or goods furnished for the purpose of
preventing, alleviating, curing, or healing human illness, physical
disability, or injury.
SECTION 14. IC 34-7-7-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) This chapter
applies to an act in furtherance of a person's right of petition or free
speech under the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution
of the State of Indiana in connection with a public issue or an issue of
public interest that arises after June 30, 1998. This chapter does not
apply to an action that was filed and is pending before July 1, 1998.
(b) This chapter does not apply to:
(1) an enforcement action brought in the name of the state of
Indiana by the attorney general, a prosecuting attorney, or another
attorney acting as a public prosecutor; or
(2) an action brought under:
(A) IC 16-34-7-6;
(B) IC 16-34-7-9;
(C) IC 16-34-7-18; or
(D) IC 16-34-7-20.
SECTION 15. IC 34-13-9-0.7, AS ADDED BY P.L.4-2015,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.7. This chapter does not:
(1) authorize a provider to refuse to offer or provide services,
facilities, use of public accommodations, goods, employment, or
housing to any member or members of the general public on the
basis of race, color, religion, ancestry, age, national origin,
disability, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or United
States military service;
(2) establish a defense to a civil action or criminal prosecution for
refusal by a provider to offer or provide services, facilities, use of
public accommodations, goods, employment, or housing to any
member or members of the general public on the basis of race,
color, religion, ancestry, age, national origin, disability, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity, or United States military
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


service; or
(3) limit or curtail the scope of any law of the state of Indiana
that regulates or restricts abortion or that withholds taxpayer
funds from entities that perform or promote abortions; or
(3) (4) negate any rights available under the Constitution of the
State of Indiana.
SECTION 16. IC 34-13-9-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2015,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A governmental entity statute, ordinance,
resolution, executive or administrative order, regulation, custom, or
usage may not be construed to be exempt from the application of this
chapter unless a state statute expressly exempts the statute, ordinance,
resolution, executive or administrative order, regulation, custom, or
usage from the application of this chapter by citation to this chapter.
(b) This chapter does not apply to IC 16-34 or any action to
enforce the requirements of IC 16-34.
SECTION 17. IC 34-30-2.1-218.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 218.5. IC 16-34-7-21 (Concerning
abortion inducing drugs).
SECTION 18. IC 35-46-5-1.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.213-2016,
SECTION 30, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) As used in this section, "aborted" means
the termination of human pregnancy with an intention other than to
produce a live birth or to remove a dead fetus. The term includes
abortions by surgical procedures and by abortion inducing drugs in
violation of IC 16-34-7.
(b) As used in this section, "fetal tissue" includes tissue, organs, or
any other part of an aborted fetus.
(c) This section does not apply to the proper medical disposal of
fetal tissue.
(d) A person who intentionally acquires, receives, sells, or transfers
fetal tissue commits unlawful transfer of fetal tissue, a Level 5 felony.
(e) A person may not alter the timing, method, or procedure used to
terminate a pregnancy for the purpose of obtaining or collecting fetal
tissue. A person who violates this subsection commits the unlawful
collection of fetal tissue, a Level 5 felony.
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Judiciary, to which was
referred Senate Bill No. 236, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with the
recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 1, delete lines 1 through 15.
Page 2, delete lines 1 through 10.
Page 9, delete line 42, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 11. IC 16-34-2-4.7, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.7. (a) As used in this section, "abortion
complication" means only the following physical or psychological
conditions arising from the induction or performance of an abortion:
(1) Uterine perforation.
(2) Cervical laceration.
(3) Infection.
(4) Vaginal bleeding that qualifies as a Grade 2 or higher adverse
event according to the Common Terminology Criteria for Adverse
Events (CTCAE).
(5) Pulmonary embolism.
(6) Deep vein thrombosis.
(7) Failure to terminate the pregnancy.
(8) Incomplete abortion (retained tissue).
(9) Pelvic inflammatory disease.
(10) Missed ectopic pregnancy.
(11) Cardiac arrest.
(12) Respiratory arrest.
(13) Renal failure.
(14) Shock.
(15) Amniotic fluid embolism.
(16) Coma.
(17) Placenta previa in subsequent pregnancies.
(18) Pre-term delivery in subsequent pregnancies.
(19) Free fluid in the abdomen.
(20) Hemolytic reaction due to the administration of
ABO-incompatible blood or blood products.
(21) Hypoglycemia occurring while the patient is being treated at
the hospital or ambulatory outpatient surgical center.
(22) Allergic reaction to anesthesia. or abortion inducing drugs.
(23) Psychological complications, including depression, suicidal
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


ideation, anxiety, and sleeping disorders.
(24) Death.
(25) Any other adverse event as defined by criteria provided in
the Food and Drug Administration Safety Information and
Adverse Event Reporting Program.
(b) The following persons shall report to the state department each
case in which the person treated a patient suffering from an abortion
complication:
(1) A physician licensed under IC 25-22.5.
(2) A hospital licensed under IC 16-21.
(3) Beginning September 1, 2022, an ambulatory outpatient
surgical center licensed under IC 16-21-2.
(c) The state department shall develop a process for the submission
of a report under this section.
(d) A report under this section shall be submitted to the state
department in the manner prescribed by the state department.
(e) The report under this section must include the following
information concerning the abortion complication:
(1) The date the patient presented for treatment for the abortion
complication.
(2) The age of the patient.
(3) The race of the patient.
(4) The county and state of the patient's residence.
(5) The type of abortion obtained by the patient.
(6) The date of abortion obtained by the patient.
(7) The name of the:
(A) hospital; or
(B) ambulatory outpatient surgical center;
where the patient obtained the abortion.
(8) Whether the abortion was performed or occurred in
Indiana or outside Indiana.
(8) (9) Whether the patient obtained abortion medication via mail
order or Internet web site, website, and if so, information
identifying the source of the medication.
(9) (10) Whether the complication was previously managed by the
abortion provider or the abortion provider's required back-up
physician.
(10) (11) The name of the medications taken by the patient as part
of the pharmaceutical abortion regimen, if any.
(11) (12) A list of each diagnosed complication.
(12) (13) A list of each treated complication, with a description of
the treatment provided.
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


(13) (14) Whether the patient's visit to treat the complications was
the original visit or a follow-up visit.
(14) (15) The date of each follow-up visit, if any.
(15) (16) A list of each complication diagnosed at a follow-up
visit, if any.
(16) (17) A list of each complication treated at a follow-up visit,
if any.
(18) The location, including the facility name and city or town,
where the patient presented for treatment of the abortion
complication.
(19) The full name of the health care provider who provided
treatment for the abortion complication.
(f) The state department shall send each report received under
this section to the office of the inspector general.
(f) (g) On a quarterly basis, the state department shall compile a
public report summarizing the information collected under this section.
The report must include statistics for the previous calendar quarter,
with updated information for the most recent calendar quarter.
(g) (h) The state department shall summarize the aggregate data
from the data submitted under this section and submit the data, on or
before June 30 of each year, to the United States Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention for its inclusion in the annual Vital Statistics
Report.
(h) (i) The state department shall ensure that no identifying
information of a pregnant woman is included in the report described in
subsection (f). (g).
(i) (j) This subsection applies after August 31, 2020. Each failure to
report an abortion complication as required under this section is a Class
B misdemeanor.
(j) (k) The state department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this section.".
Delete pages 10 through 12.
Page 13, delete lines 1 through 5.
Page 16, line 23, delete "attorney general." and insert "inspector
general.".
Page 16, delete lines 24 through 42.
Page 17, delete lines 1 through 4.
Page 17, line 5, delete "(i)" and insert "(f)".
Page 17, line 15, delete "(j)" and insert "(g)".
Page 17, delete lines 21 through 25.
Page 21, line 31, delete "4" and insert "6".
Page 22, line 1, delete "4" and insert "6".
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107


Page 32, line 12, delete "5, 8, or 17" and insert "6, 9, or 18".
Page 36, between lines 2 and 3, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(j) A court may not award attorney's fees or costs under this
section if the award would violate:
(1) the Constitution of the State of Indiana;
(2) the Constitution of the United States; or
(3) federal law.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 236 as introduced.)
CARRASCO, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 7, Nays 4.
_____
SENATE MOTION
Mr. President: I move that Senate Bill 236 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 11, delete lines 39 through 42.
Delete pages 12 through 14.
Page 15, delete lines 1 through 30.
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
(Reference is to SB 236 as printed January 23, 2026.)
JOHNSON T
SB 236—LS 7104/DI 107